src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V0_VÕÕIDÂD !!= * @CODE@ võõidâd:võõid

! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! 1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.2 Lacks Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.2[111] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster)
!   Weak grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3
!   Weak grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: võõidâd
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: vââid
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: vââiʹde
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: võõiʹde
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: võõid
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: võõidâž
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: vââidas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: võõidu
! (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: vââidaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: vââid»
! * Yaml: 
! võõidâd:võõid
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !1
:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !2
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !3
:%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ÂD ; !4
: VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !5
+Pot+Sg3:%>âž   K ; !6
+Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%>as K ; !7
: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !8

+Der/mõš:»mõš N_LOOKKMÕŠ ;
+Der/škueʹtted:»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
+Der/ted:»ât  V_AALǤTED ;

LEXICON V_ČIISTÂD !!= * @CODE@ čiistâd:čiist
+V: V0_ČIISTÂD ;
LEXICON IV_ČIISTÂD !!= * @CODE@ čiistâd:čiist
+V+IV: V0_ČIISTÂD ;
LEXICON TV_ČIISTÂD !!= * @CODE@ čiistâd:čiist
+V+TV: V0_ČIISTÂD ;
LEXICON V0_ČIISTÂD !!= * @CODE@ čiistâd:čiist

! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! 1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.2 Lacks Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.2[111] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster)
!   Weak grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3
!   Weak grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: čiistâd
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: čeest
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: čeeʹste
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: čiiʹste
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: čiist
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: čiistâž
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: čeestas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: čiistu
! (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: čeestaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: čiist»
! * Yaml: 
! čiistâd:čiist
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !1
:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !2
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !3
:%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ÂD ; !4
: VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !5
+Pot+Sg3:%>âž   K ; !6
+Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%>as K ; !7
: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !8

+Der/mõš:»mõš N_LOOKKMÕŠ ;
+Der/škueʹtted:»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
+Der/ted:»ât  V_AALǤTED ;

LEXICON V_SLUUŽÂD !!= * @CODE@ sluužâd:sluuž
+V: V0_SLUUŽÂD ;
LEXICON IV_SLUUŽÂD !!= * @CODE@ sluužâd:sluuž
+V+IV: V0_SLUUŽÂD ;
LEXICON TV_SLUUŽÂD !!= * @CODE@ sluužâd:sluuž
+V+TV: V0_SLUUŽÂD ;
LEXICON V0_SLUUŽÂD !!= * @CODE@ sluužâd:sluuž

! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! 1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.2 Lacks Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.2[111] (Monophthong + Single Consonant)
!   Weak grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3
!   Weak grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: sluužâd
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: sloož
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: slooʹže
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: sluuʹže
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: sluuž
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: sluužâž
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: sloožas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: sluužu
! (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: sloožaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: sluuž»
! * Yaml: 
! sluužâd:sluuž
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !1
:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !2
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !3
:%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ÂD ; !4
: VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !5
+Pot+Sg3:%>âž   K ; !6
+Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%>as K ; !7
: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !8

+Der/mõš:»mõš N_LOOKKMÕŠ ;
+Der/škueʹtted:»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
+Der/ted:»ât  V_AALǤTED ;

LEXICON V_PLIÂSNÂD !!= * @CODE@ pliâsnâd:pliâsn
+V: V0_PLIÂSNÂD ;
LEXICON IV_PLIÂSNÂD !!= * @CODE@ pliâsnâd:pliâsn
+V+IV: V0_PLIÂSNÂD ;
LEXICON TV_PLIÂSNÂD !!= * @CODE@ pliâsnâd:pliâsn
+V+TV: V0_PLIÂSNÂD ;
LEXICON V0_PLIÂSNÂD !!= * @CODE@ pliâsnâd:pliâsn

! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! 1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.2 Lacks Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.2[111] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster)
!   Weak grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3
!   Weak grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: pliâsnâd
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: pleäsn
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: pleäʹsne
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: plieʹsne
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: pliâsn
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: pliâsnâž
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: pleäsnas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: pliâsnu
! (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: pleäsnaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: pliâsn»
! * Yaml: 
! pliâsnâd:pliâsn
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !1
:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !2
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !3
:%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ÂD ; !4
: VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !5
+Pot+Sg3:%>âž   K ; !6
+Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%>as K ; !7
: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !8

+Der/mõš:»mõš N_LOOKKMÕŠ ;
+Der/škueʹtted:»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
+Der/ted:»ât  V_AALǤTED ;

LEXICON V_SUUDÂD !!= * @CODE@ suudâd:suud
+V: V0_SUUDÂD ;
LEXICON IV_SUUDÂD !!= * @CODE@ suudâd:suud
+V+IV: V0_SUUDÂD ;
LEXICON TV_SUUDÂD !!= * @CODE@ suudâd:suud
+V+TV: V0_SUUDÂD ;
LEXICON V0_SUUDÂD !!= * @CODE@ suudâd:suud

!
! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! 1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.2 Lacks Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.2[111] (Diphthong + Consonant Cluster)
!   Weak grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3
!   Weak grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: suudâd
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: sooud
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: soouʹde
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: suuʹde
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: suud
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: suudâž
! (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: sooudas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: suudu
! (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: sooudaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: suud»
! * Yaml: 
! suudâd:suud
: VSUF-INF_ÂD ; !1
:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ÂD ; !2
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !3
:%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ÂD ; !4
: VSUF-I-POTKOND_ÂD ; !5
+Pot+Sg3:%>âž   K ; !6
+Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%>as K ; !7
: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ÂD ; !8

+Der/mõš:»mõš N_LOOKKMÕŠ ;
+Der/škueʹtted:»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
+Der/ted:»ât  V_AALǤTED ;

!! !CLASS 1 LOW VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION
!! Even-syllable stems in -AD

LEXICON V_TEEVVAD !!= * @CODE@ teevvad:teevv
+V: V0_TEEVVAD ;
LEXICON IV_TEEVVAD !!= * @CODE@ teevvad:teevv
+V+IV: V0_TEEVVAD ;
LEXICON TV_TEEVVAD !!= * @CODE@ teevvad:teevv
+V+TV: V0_TEEVVAD ;
