src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
kââhhad:kââhh V_TEEVVAD ;
kåållad:kååll V_TEEVVAD ;
leevvad:leevv V_TEEVVAD ;
lääđđad:lääđđ V_TEEVVAD ;
lååjjad:lååjj V_TEEVVAD ;
låånnad:låånn V_TEEVVAD ;
miâhhâd:miâhh V_PLIÂSNÂD ;
måållad:mååll V_TEEVVAD ;
njoođđad:njoođđ V_TEEVVAD ;
njuõckâd:njuõck V_PLIÂSNÂD ;
nääđđad:nääđđ V_TEEVVAD ;
peellad:peell V_TEEVVAD ;
påånnad:påånn V_TEEVVAD ;
reennad:reenn V_TEEVVAD ;
rääppad:rääpp V_TEEVVAD ;
rääʹssad:rääʹss V_TEEVVAD ;
rååttad:råått V_TEEVVAD ;
rååʹttad:rååʹtt V_TEEVVAD ;
seellad:seell V_TEEVVAD ;
seennad:seenn V_TEEVVAD ;
stiikâd:stiik V_SUUDÂD ;
suudâd:suud V_SUUDÂD ;
sââjjad:sââjj V_TEEVVAD ;
sââvvad:sââvv V_TEEVVAD ;
sååvvad:sååvv V_TEEVVAD ;
teevvad:teevv V_TEEVVAD ;
tääjjad:tääjj V_TEEVVAD ;
täällad:tääll V_TEEVVAD ;
täärrad:täärr V_TEEVVAD ;
täävvad:täävv V_TEEVVAD ;
veeđđad:veeđđ V_TEEVVAD ;
viâhhâd:viâhh V_PLIÂSNÂD ;
vââjjad:vââjj V_TEEVVAD ;
vââđđad:vââđđ V_TEEVVAD ;
väällad:vääll V_TEEVVAD ;
äännad:äänn V_TEEVVAD ;
åårrad:åårr V_TEEVVAD ;
čiistâd:čiist V_ČIISTÂD ;
čäävvad:čäävv V_TEEVVAD ;
čåållad:čååll V_TEEVVAD ;
